Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-640
Commercial dog or cat breeder; duties.

A commercial dog
or cat breeder shall:

(1) Maintain housing facilities and primary enclosures in
a sanitary condition;

(2) Enable all dogs and cats to remain dry and clean;

(3) Provide shelter and protection from extreme temperatures
and weather conditions that may be uncomfortable or hazardous to the dogs
and cats;

(4) Provide sufficient shade to shelter all the dogs and
cats housed in the primary enclosure at one time;

(5) Provide dogs and cats with easy and convenient access
to adequate amounts of clean food and water;

(6) Provide dogs with adequate
socialization. For purposes of this subdivision, adequate socialization
means physical contact with other dogs and with human beings, other than being
fed;

(7) Assure that a handler's
hands are washed before and after handling each infectious or contagious cat;

(8) Maintain a written veterinary
care plan developed in conjunction with an attending veterinarian; and

(9) Provide veterinary care
without delay when necessary.

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB241, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB427, § 6.